Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Chapter 52. Fishery Industrial Technology Center.

Sec. 16.52.010.
Fishery Industrial Technology Center.

There is established a Fishery Industrial Technology Center as part of the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.010. Renumbered in 1981.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this chapter, see § 1, ch. 44, SLA 1981, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.52.020.
Duties.

The center shall create employment opportunities in the state’s fishing industry and other benefits to the state by

providing training opportunities to citizens of the state on the most efficient and appropriate technologies for the harvesting, processing, and conservation of the fishery resources of the state;

providing information and technical assistance on the adaptation of existing and new technologies to the users of the fishery resources of the state;

providing research and development activities to adapt existing technologies to enhance the economic viability of the industry;

providing research and development activities to create new technologies that will enhance the effectiveness of the industry, and provide economic benefits to state citizens; and

encouraging joint projects between industry and government in order to use industrial experience and government programs to enhance the productivity of the industry.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.020. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 16.52.030.
Fishery Industrial Technology Policy Council.

A Fishery Industrial Technology Policy Council is established to provide program and planning guidance to the center. The policy council shall be composed of members of the state’s fishing and processing industry.

The policy council consists of seven members appointed by the president of the University of Alaska, including

two members appointed from the seafood processing industry; the members appointed under this paragraph shall be owners or employees of firms that are in operation in the state and, insofar as possible, shall represent diverse processing operations;

two members who are commercial fishermen; the members appointed under this paragraph shall be actively engaged in commercial fishing in the state and, insofar as possible, shall represent fishing for diverse fisheries resources;

three public members.

A member of the policy council serves a term of two years.

At least five members of the policy council shall be residents of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.030. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 16.52.040.
Location.

The principal activities of the center shall be located in Kodiak, Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.040. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 16.52.050.
Annual report.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall prepare an annual report of the center’s activities and notify the legislature by the 20th day of each regular session that the report is available. The report must include a description of the work conducted by the center, the training sessions held and number of students trained, and any other information that the Board of Regents determines should be included to describe the work of the center.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981; am § 25 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.050. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 16.52.060.
Cooperation with other agencies.

In the development of its programs the center shall consult with

the Department of Fish and Game;

the division of economic development of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

the Department of Natural Resources;

the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation;

the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute;

the North Pacific Fishery Management Council;

the National Marine Fisheries Service;

the Department of Education and Early Development; and

the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.060. Renumbered in 1981.

In 1999, former paragraphs (4)-(11) were renumbered as (2)-(9), respectively, to reflect the 1985 repeal of former (2) and (3).
Also, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in paragraph (2), “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in paragraph (8), and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in paragraph (9) in accordance with §§ 88 - 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (2) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 16.52.070.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“center” means the Fishery Industrial Technology Center;

“policy council” means the Fishery Industrial Technology Policy Council.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.12.070. Renumbered in 1981.